Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 4. Licensing of Commercial Fishing Crewmembers and Vessels.
Sec. 16.05.723.
Misdemeanor commercial fishing penalties.

A person who negligently violates AS

16.05.440

—

16.05.690

, or a regulation of the Board of Fisheries or the department governing commercial fishing, is guilty of a misdemeanor and in addition to punishment under other provisions in this title, including AS

16.05.195

and

16.05.710

, is punishable upon conviction by a fine of not more than $15,000 or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both. In addition, the court shall order forfeiture of any fish, or its fair market value, taken or retained as a result of the commission of the violation, and the court may forfeit any vessel and any fishing gear, including any net, pot, tackle, or other device designed or employed to take fish commercially, that was used in or in aid of the violation. Any fish, or its fair market value, forfeited under this subsection may not also be forfeited under AS

16.05.195

. For purposes of this subsection, it is a rebuttable presumption that all fish found on board a fishing vessel used in or in aid of a violation, or found at the fishing site, were taken or retained in violation of AS

16.05.440

—

16.05.690

or a commercial fisheries regulation of the Board of Fisheries or the department, and it is the defendant’s burden to show by a preponderance of the evidence that fish on board or at the site were lawfully taken and retained.

If a person is convicted under this section of one of the following offenses, then, in addition to the penalties imposed under (a) of this section, the court may impose a fine equal to the gross value of the fish found on board or at the fishing site at the time of the violation:

commercial fishing in closed waters;

commercial fishing during a closed period or season;

commercial fishing with unlawful gear, including a net, pot, tackle, or other device designed or employed to take fish commercially; or

commercial fishing without a limited entry permit holder on board if the holder is required by law or regulation to be present.

Upon a third misdemeanor conviction within a period of 10 years for an offense listed in (b) of this section or any combination of offenses listed in (b) of this section, the court shall impose, in addition to any penalties imposed under (a) of this section, a fine equal to three times the gross value of the fish found on board or at the fishing site at the time of the offense, or a fine equal to $10,000, whichever is greater.

History.

(§ 3 ch 46 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For prohibitions, see 5 AAC 38, art. 4.